Hawaii statutes.
[§508C-12] Registry. The department
shall establish a registry that contains all environmental covenants and any
amendment or termination of those covenants. The registry may also contain any
other information concerning environmental covenants and the real property
subject to them that the department considers appropriate. The department
shall make the registry available for public access electronically on its website
or at another appropriate place. The registry is a public record for purposes
of chapter 92F. [L 2006, c 279, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next